Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.276

Waiver of rule-set penalties—Notice by organization seeking relief—Investigation.

The secretary may waive penalties that have been set by rule and assessed by the secretary due from a registered entity previously in good standing that would otherwise be penalized. An entity desiring to seek relief under this section must, within fifteen days of discovery of the missed filing or lapse by its officers, directors, or other persons responsible for the missed filing or lapse, notify the secretary in writing. The notification must include the name and mailing address of the organization, the organization's officer to whom correspondence should be sent, and a statement under oath by a responsible officer of the organization, setting forth the nature of the missed filing or lapse, the circumstances giving rise to the missed filing or lapse, and the relief sought. Upon receipt of the notice, the secretary shall investigate the circumstances of the missed filing or lapse. If the secretary is satisfied that sufficient exigent or mitigating circumstances exist, that the entity has demonstrated good faith and a reasonable attempt to comply with the applicable charitable solicitation statute of this state, the secretary may issue an order allowing relief from the penalty. If the secretary determines the request does not comply with the requirements for relief, the secretary shall deny the relief and state the reasons for the denial. Notwithstanding chapter 34.05 RCW, a denial of relief by the secretary is not reviewable.

[ 2011 c 199 s 20; 1994 c 287 s 4.]